src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/verb_prefixes.lexc
LEXICON PREFIX_SETS
@P.class.VAI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VII@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTI@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;
@P.class.VTA@	BASIC_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_PREFIXES
@P.mode.IND@	BASIC_IND_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.CON@	BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.SUB@	BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IRR@	BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES ;
@P.mode.IMP@	BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IND_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%< NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%< NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%< NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0 NEG_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_CNJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0    NEG_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_SBJ_PREFIXES
@P.person.NULL@0	NEG_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IRR_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0    NEG_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON BASIC_IMP_PREFIXES
@P.person.IMP@0    NEG_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NEG_PREFIXES
0 TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@%^SPi2máát%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@miin%< PREVERBS ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.neg.NEG@piin%< PREVERBS ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@Neg+PV/máátaommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.neg.NEG@%^SPi2máátaommita'p%< TENSE_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON TENSE_PREFIXES
0 ASPECT_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@Imm+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@ayáak%< ASPECT_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@Dur+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@á%< ASPECT_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@Fut+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@yáak%< ASPECT_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@Past+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@ii%< ASPECT_PREFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@Past+:@R.pos.VERB@@D.mode.IMP@na%< ASPECT_PREFIXES ; ! Siksika past

LEXICON ASPECT_PREFIXES
0 IRR_PREFIX ;
@D.mode.IMP@Perf+:@D.mode.IMP@akáa IRR_PREFIX ; ! maybe deal with elsewhere?
@D.mode.IMP@Perf+:@D.mode.IMP@ikáa IRR_PREFIX ;
@D.mode.IMP@Perf+:@D.mode.IMP@okáa IRR_PREFIX ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON IRR_PREFIX !
0 PREVERBS ;
@D.neg.NEG@Neg+PV/ikátá'+:@D.neg.NEG@i2kátá'%< PREVERBS ; !  SP per grammar?
